Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.260

Interest on unpaid balances.

Except as otherwise specified by law, the department is authorized to charge interest at the rate authorized under RCW 43.17.240 for all unpaid balances for moneys owed to the department.

[ 1995 c 374 s 64.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.